el: Τύπος σανίδας: Κλασική; Cruiser; Longboard; Mini-cruiser; Mountainboard; Ιδιαίτερο σχήμα; Άλλο
lt-LT: Lentos tipas: Klasikinis; Kelioninė; Ilgoji riedlentė; Mini kelioninė; Kalnų riedlentė; Speciali forma; Kita
ru: Тип деки: Классический; Круизер; Лонгборд; Мини-крейсер; Маунтинборд; Специальной формы; Другое
hr-HR: Vrsta daske: Klasična; Cruiser; Duga daska; Mini-cruiser; Planinska; Poseban oblik; Ostalo
sv: Brädtyp: Klassisk; Kryssare; Longboard; Minikryssare; Mountainboard; Specialform; Övrigt
sl-SI: Vrsta rolke: Klasična; Križarka; Longboard; Mini-cruiser; Mountainboard; Posebna oblika; Druga
de: Bretttyp: Klassisch; Cruiser; Longboard; Mini-Cruiser; Mountainboard; Besondere Form; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Tipo de prancha: Clássico; Cruiser; Longboard; Mini-cruiser; Mountainboard; Formato especial; Outro
ro-RO: Tip placă: Clasică; Cruiser; Longboard; Mini-cruiser; Mountainboard; Formă specială; Altele
zh-CN: 板类型: 经典; 巡逻警车; 长板; 迷你沙滩车; 登山板; 特殊形状; 其他
hu: Deszka típusa: Klasszikus; Cruiser; Longboard; Mini-cruiser; Mountainboard; Különleges formájú; Egyéb
th: ประเภทบอร์ด: แบบคลาสสิก; ครูสเซอร์; บอร์ดยาว; มินิครูสเซอร์; เมาน์เทนบอร์ด; รูปทรงพิเศษ; อื่นๆ
nb: Type brett: Klassisk; Cruiser; Longboard; Mini-cruiser; Mountainboard; Spesialform; Annet
es: Tipo de tabla: Clásico; Crucero; Tabla larga; Mini-cruiser; Tabla de montaña; Forma especial; Otros
nl: Dashboardtype: Klassiek; Cruiser; Longboard; Mini-cruiser; Mountainboard; Speciale vorm; Andere
tr: Board Tipi: Klasik; Cruiser; Uzun tahta; Mini cruiser; Dağ tahtası; Özel şekil; Diğer
bg-BG: Тип дъска: Класически; Крузър; Лонгборд; Мини-крузър; Маунтинборд; Специална форма; Други
zh-TW: 版型: 經典; 徑向; 長板; 迷你交通板; 登山板; 特殊造型; 其他
vi: Loại ván: Cổ điển; Lốp không gấp; Ván dài; Ván trượt nhỏ; Ván trượt leo núi; Kiểu dáng đặc biệt; Khác
fr: Type de planche: Classique; Croiseur; Planche longue; Mini-cruiser; Planche de montagne; Forme spéciale; Autre
cs: Typ prkna: Klasický; Cruiser; Longboard; Mini-cruiser; Mountainboard; Speciální tvar; Jiné
sk-SK: Typ dosky: Klasický; Krížový; Dlhý; Krátky; Mountainboard; Špeciálny tvar; Iné
en: Board type: Classic; Cruiser; Longboard; Mini-cruiser; Mountainboard; Special shape; Other
da: Brættype: Klassisk; Cruiser; Longboard; Mini-cruiser; Mountainboard; Speciel form; Andet
ja: ボードのタイプ: クラシック; クルーザー; ロングボード; ミニクルーザー; マウンテンボード; 特殊形状; その他
it: Tipo di tavola: Classico; Cruiser; Longboard; Mini-cruiser; Mountainboard; Forma speciale; Altro
pt-BR: Tipo de skate: Clássico; Cruiser; Longboard; Minicruzador; Mountainboard; Formato especial; Outro
ko: 보드 유형: 클래식; 순찰차; 롱보드; 미니 크루저; 마운틴보드; 특수 모양; 기타
pl: Typ deski: Klasyczny; Krążownik; Longboard; Minikrążownik; Mountainboard; Specjalny kształt; Inne
fi: Levytyyppi: Klassinen; Cruiser; Longboard; Mini Cruiser -skeittilauta; Mountainboard; Erikoismuoto; Muu